Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-308
Failure of term; pending proceedings continued.

No recognizance, or other instrument or proceeding, shall be rendered invalid by reason of there being a failure of the term, but all proceedings pending in court shall be continued to the next regular or special term, unless an adjournment be made as authorized in section 24-307.

Laws 1879, § 32, p. 88;

R.S.1913, § 1167;

C.S.1922, § 1090;

C.S.1929, § 27-308;

R.S.1943, § 24-308.

Recognizance continues in force. Bartling v. State, 67 Neb. 637, 93 N.W. 1047 (1903), affirming 67 Neb. 643, 97 N.W. 443 (1903).